Utah statutes.
31A-22-902.   Fraternal contract.
(1)  A fraternal shall issue to each benefit member a policy or certificate
specifying the benefits provided and containing at least the substance of all
sections of the laws of the fraternal which might result in the termination of
coverage or the reduction of benefits.  The policy or certificate, any riders
or endorsements attached to them, the laws of the fraternal, and the
application and declarations made in connection with these which are signed by
the applicant, constitute the agreement between the fraternal and the member,
and the policy or certificate shall state this.
(2)  Any changes in the laws of a fraternal which are made subsequent to the
issuance of a policy or certificate bind the member and beneficiary as if they
had been in force at the time of the application, so long as they do not
destroy or diminish any benefits provided in the policy or certificate.
(3)  Copies of any documents mentioned in Subsections (1) and (2), certified
by the secretary or corresponding officer of the fraternal, are evidence of
the terms and conditions of the contract.
(4)  Section 31A-21-106 does not apply to fraternal contracts.
(5)  If a fraternal's laws provide for expulsion or suspension of a member for
any reason other than nonpayment of premium, the fraternal's insurance
certificate shall contain a provision that if a member is expelled or
suspended for any reason other than nonpayment of premium, the expelled member
has the right to maintain the policy in force by continuing to pay the
required premium.
(6)  The policy or certificate shall contain a maintenance of solvency
provision pursuant to Subsection 31A-9-209(2).
(7)  This section applies to all contracts made by a fraternal beginning July
1, 1986.  A fraternal may elect to have this section apply at an earlier date,
as long as it applies simultaneously to all of its contracts and the fraternal
gives the commissioner at least 30 days notice of its intention to apply this
section.
